Wyoming, session 2025, HB0291.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 13-10-401 through 13-10-405 are
created to read:

ARTICLE 4
RESTRICTED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION LIST

13-10-401. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Banking contract" means a contract entered
into by the state treasurer or the state auditor and a
financial institution to provide banking services to the
state or any political subdivision thereof;

(ii) "Boycott of energy companies" means a
financial institution that, without a reasonable business
or financial purpose, discriminates against an energy
company because the company:

HB0291

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0324
(A) Engages in the exploration, production,
use, transportation, sale or manufacturing of fossil
fuel-based energy;

(B) Engages in the exploration, production,
use, transportation, sale or manufacturing of fossil
fuel-based energy and does not commit or pledge to meet
environmental standards beyond applicable federal and state
law; or

(C) Does business with a company that
engages in the exploration, production, use,
transportation, sale or manufacturing of fossil fuel-based
energy.

(iii) "Company" means any sole proprietorship,
organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint
venture, limited partnership, limited liability
partnership, limited liability company or other entity or
business association, including all wholly owned
subsidiaries, majority owned subsidiaries, parent companies
or affiliates of those entities or business associations,
which exist for the purpose of making profit;
HB0291

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0324

(iv) "Discriminate" means as defined in W.S.
13-10-301(a)(ii);

(v) "Financial institution" means as defined in
W.S. 13-10-301(a)(iii);

(vi) "Reasonable business purpose" includes any
purpose directly related to:

(A) Promoting the financial success or
stability of a financial institution;

(B) Mitigating risk to a financial
institution;

(C) Complying with legal or regulatory
requirements; or

(D) Limiting liability of a financial
institution.

HB0291

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0324
(vii) "Restricted financial institution" means a
financial institution included in the most recently updated
and posted restricted financial institution list;

(viii) "Restricted financial institution list"
means the list of financial institutions prepared,
maintained and published pursuant to this article.

13-10-402. Restricted financial institutions list.

(a) The secretary of state shall prepare and maintain
a list of financial institutions that are engaged in a
boycott of energy companies. The list prepared under this
subsection shall be known as the "restricted financial
institution list."

(b) The secretary of state shall submit a copy of the
restricted financial institution list to the board of
deposits, the president of the senate and the speaker of
the house of representatives. Upon an affirmative vote by
the board of deposits the secretary of state shall publicly
post the restricted financial institution list on the
secretary of state's official website.
HB0291

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0324

(c) A citation to this article and a brief summary of
the purpose of the restricted financial institution list
shall appear at the top of the restricted financial
institution list, including a statement that inclusion on
the restricted financial institution list is neither an
indication of unsafe or unsound operating conditions of any
financial institution nor an indication of any risk to
consumer deposits.

(d) The secretary of state shall update the
restricted financial institution list annually, or more
often as the secretary considers necessary, and submit the
updated restricted financial institution list for approval
according to subsection (b) of this section.

13-10-403. Notice to financial institutions.

(a) Not later than forty-five (45) days before
including a financial institution on the restricted
financial institution list, the secretary of state shall
send a written notice to the institution containing the
following information:
HB0291

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0324

(i) That the secretary of state has determined
that the financial institution is a restricted financial
institution;

(ii) That the financial institution will be
placed on the restricted financial institution list in
forty-five (45) days unless, within thirty (30) days after
receipt of the written notice, the restricted financial
institution demonstrates that it is not engaged in a
boycott of energy companies;

(iii) That the restricted financial institution
list is published on the secretary of state's official
website;

(iv) That the institution's placement on the
restricted financial institution list may render the
institution ineligible to enter into, or renew, banking
contracts with the state of Wyoming.

(b) After a restricted financial institution's
inclusion on the restricted financial institution list, the
HB0291

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0324
secretary of state shall remove the institution from the
restricted financial institution list if the institution
demonstrates that it has ceased all activity that boycotts
energy companies.

13-10-404. Sources of information.

(a) In determining whether to include a financial
institution on the restricted financial institution list,
the secretary of state shall consider and may rely upon any
of the following information:

(i) A financial institution's attestation that
it is not engaged in a boycott of energy companies;

(ii) Publicly available statements or
information made by a financial institution, including
statements by a member of a financial institution's
governing body, an executive director of a financial
institution or any other officer or employee of a financial
institution with the authority to issue policy statements
on behalf of a financial institution;

HB0291

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0324
(iii) Information published by a state or
federal government entity.

(b) In determining whether to include a financial
institution on the restricted financial institution list,
the secretary of state shall not rely solely on any of the
following information:

(i) Statements or complaints by an energy
company;

(ii) Media reports of a financial institution's
boycott of energy companies.

(c) A financial institution shall not be compelled to
produce or disclose any data or information deemed
confidential, privileged or otherwise protected from
disclosure by state or federal law.

13-10-405. Restricted financial institutions.

(a) The state treasurer and the state auditor shall
refuse to enter into a new banking contract or renew an
HB0291

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0324
existing banking contract with a restricted financial
institution.

(b) The state treasurer and the state auditor shall
require, as a term of any banking contract, an agreement by
the financial institution not to engage in a boycott of
energy companies for the duration of the contract.

Section 2. W.S. 13-10-301(a)(ii) by creating a new
subparagraph (D) and by renumbering (D) as (E) is amended
to read:

13-10-301. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(ii) "Discriminate" means to:

(D) Take action that is intended to
penalize, inflict economic harm on or limit commercial
relations with a company;

HB0291

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0324
(D)(E) Otherwise unlawfully discriminate
against a person.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0291